6.4.1/fr-toutesvariantes.aff
FLAG long
SFX c5 éguer èguera/n'q'm't's' éguer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c5 éler èlera/n'q'm't's' éler po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c5 émer èmera/n'q'm't's' émer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c5 éner ènera/n'q'm't's' éner po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c5 éper èpera/n'q'm't's' éper po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c5 équer èquera/n'q'm't's' équer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c5 érer èrera/n'q'm't's' érer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c5 éser èsera/n'q'm't's' éser po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c5 éter ètera/n'q'm't's' éter po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c5 étrer ètrera/n'q'm't's' étrer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c5 évrer èvrera/n'q'm't's' évrer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c5 éyer èyera/n'q'm't's' éyer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c5 er erons/n't' er po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c5 ébrer èbrerons/n't' ébrer po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c5 écer ècerons/n't' écer po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c5 écher ècherons/n't' écher po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c5 écrer ècrerons/n't' écrer po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c5 éder èderons/n't' éder po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c5 éger ègerons/n't' éger po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c5 égler èglerons/n't' égler po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c5 égner ègnerons/n't' égner po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c5 égrer ègrerons/n't' égrer po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c5 éguer èguerons/n't' éguer po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c5 éler èlerons/n't' éler po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c5 émer èmerons/n't' émer po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c5 éner ènerons/n't' éner po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c5 éper èperons/n't' éper po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c5 équer èquerons/n't' équer po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c5 érer èrerons/n't' érer po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c5 éser èserons/n't' éser po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c5 éter èterons/n't' éter po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c5 étrer ètrerons/n't' étrer po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c5 évrer èvrerons/n't' évrer po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c5 éyer èyerons/n't' éyer po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c5 er erez/n'm' er po:ifut po:2pl
SFX c5 ébrer èbrerez/n'm' ébrer po:ifut po:2pl
SFX c5 écer ècerez/n'm' écer po:ifut po:2pl
SFX c5 écher ècherez/n'm' écher po:ifut po:2pl
SFX c5 écrer ècrerez/n'm' écrer po:ifut po:2pl
SFX c5 éder èderez/n'm' éder po:ifut po:2pl
SFX c5 éger ègerez/n'm' éger po:ifut po:2pl
SFX c5 égler èglerez/n'm' égler po:ifut po:2pl
SFX c5 égner ègnerez/n'm' égner po:ifut po:2pl
SFX c5 égrer ègrerez/n'm' égrer po:ifut po:2pl
SFX c5 éguer èguerez/n'm' éguer po:ifut po:2pl
SFX c5 éler èlerez/n'm' éler po:ifut po:2pl
SFX c5 émer èmerez/n'm' émer po:ifut po:2pl
SFX c5 éner ènerez/n'm' éner po:ifut po:2pl
SFX c5 éper èperez/n'm' éper po:ifut po:2pl
SFX c5 équer èquerez/n'm' équer po:ifut po:2pl
SFX c5 érer èrerez/n'm' érer po:ifut po:2pl
SFX c5 éser èserez/n'm' éser po:ifut po:2pl
SFX c5 éter èterez/n'm' éter po:ifut po:2pl
SFX c5 étrer ètrerez/n'm' étrer po:ifut po:2pl
SFX c5 évrer èvrerez/n'm' évrer po:ifut po:2pl
SFX c5 éyer èyerez/n'm' éyer po:ifut po:2pl
SFX c5 er eront/n'q'm't's' er po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX c5 ébrer èbreront/n'q'm't's' ébrer po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX c5 écer èceront/n'q'm't's' écer po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX c5 écher ècheront/n'q'm't's' écher po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX c5 écrer ècreront/n'q'm't's' écrer po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX c5 éder èderont/n'q'm't's' éder po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX c5 éger ègeront/n'q'm't's' éger po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX c5 égler ègleront/n'q'm't's' égler po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX c5 égner ègneront/n'q'm't's' égner po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX c5 égrer ègreront/n'q'm't's' égrer po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX c5 éguer ègueront/n'q'm't's' éguer po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX c5 éler èleront/n'q'm't's' éler po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX c5 émer èmeront/n'q'm't's' émer po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX c5 éner èneront/n'q'm't's' éner po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX c5 éper èperont/n'q'm't's' éper po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX c5 équer èqueront/n'q'm't's' équer po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX c5 érer èreront/n'q'm't's' érer po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX c5 éser èseront/n'q'm't's' éser po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX c5 éter èteront/n'q'm't's' éter po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX c5 étrer ètreront/n'q'm't's' étrer po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX c5 évrer èvreront/n'q'm't's' évrer po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX c5 éyer èyeront/n'q'm't's' éyer po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX c5 er erais/n'j'm't' er po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX c5 ébrer èbrerais/n'j'm't' ébrer po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX c5 écer ècerais/n'j'm't' écer po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX c5 écher ècherais/n'j'm't' écher po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX c5 écrer ècrerais/n'j'm't' écrer po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX c5 éder èderais/n'j'm't' éder po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX c5 éger ègerais/n'j'm't' éger po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX c5 égler èglerais/n'j'm't' égler po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX c5 égner ègnerais/n'j'm't' égner po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX c5 égrer ègrerais/n'j'm't' égrer po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX c5 éguer èguerais/n'j'm't' éguer po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX c5 éler èlerais/n'j'm't' éler po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX c5 émer èmerais/n'j'm't' émer po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX c5 éner ènerais/n'j'm't' éner po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX c5 éper èperais/n'j'm't' éper po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX c5 équer èquerais/n'j'm't' équer po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX c5 érer èrerais/n'j'm't' érer po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX c5 éser èserais/n'j'm't' éser po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX c5 éter èterais/n'j'm't' éter po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX c5 étrer ètrerais/n'j'm't' étrer po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX c5 évrer èvrerais/n'j'm't' évrer po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX c5 éyer èyerais/n'j'm't' éyer po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX c5 er erait/n'q'm't's' er po:cond po:3sg
SFX c5 ébrer èbrerait/n'q'm't's' ébrer po:cond po:3sg
SFX c5 écer ècerait/n'q'm't's' écer po:cond po:3sg
SFX c5 écher ècherait/n'q'm't's' écher po:cond po:3sg
SFX c5 écrer ècrerait/n'q'm't's' écrer po:cond po:3sg
SFX c5 éder èderait/n'q'm't's' éder po:cond po:3sg
SFX c5 éger ègerait/n'q'm't's' éger po:cond po:3sg
SFX c5 égler èglerait/n'q'm't's' égler po:cond po:3sg
SFX c5 égner ègnerait/n'q'm't's' égner po:cond po:3sg
SFX c5 égrer ègrerait/n'q'm't's' égrer po:cond po:3sg
SFX c5 éguer èguerait/n'q'm't's' éguer po:cond po:3sg
SFX c5 éler èlerait/n'q'm't's' éler po:cond po:3sg
SFX c5 émer èmerait/n'q'm't's' émer po:cond po:3sg
SFX c5 éner ènerait/n'q'm't's' éner po:cond po:3sg
SFX c5 éper èperait/n'q'm't's' éper po:cond po:3sg
SFX c5 équer èquerait/n'q'm't's' équer po:cond po:3sg
SFX c5 érer èrerait/n'q'm't's' érer po:cond po:3sg
SFX c5 éser èserait/n'q'm't's' éser po:cond po:3sg
SFX c5 éter èterait/n'q'm't's' éter po:cond po:3sg
SFX c5 étrer ètrerait/n'q'm't's' étrer po:cond po:3sg
SFX c5 évrer èvrerait/n'q'm't's' évrer po:cond po:3sg
SFX c5 éyer èyerait/n'q'm't's' éyer po:cond po:3sg
SFX c5 er erions/n't' er po:cond po:1pl
SFX c5 ébrer èbrerions/n't' ébrer po:cond po:1pl
SFX c5 écer ècerions/n't' écer po:cond po:1pl
SFX c5 écher ècherions/n't' écher po:cond po:1pl
SFX c5 écrer ècrerions/n't' écrer po:cond po:1pl
SFX c5 éder èderions/n't' éder po:cond po:1pl
SFX c5 éger ègerions/n't' éger po:cond po:1pl
SFX c5 égler èglerions/n't' égler po:cond po:1pl
SFX c5 égner ègnerions/n't' égner po:cond po:1pl
SFX c5 égrer ègrerions/n't' égrer po:cond po:1pl
SFX c5 éguer èguerions/n't' éguer po:cond po:1pl
SFX c5 éler èlerions/n't' éler po:cond po:1pl
SFX c5 émer èmerions/n't' émer po:cond po:1pl
SFX c5 éner ènerions/n't' éner po:cond po:1pl
SFX c5 éper èperions/n't' éper po:cond po:1pl
SFX c5 équer èquerions/n't' équer po:cond po:1pl
SFX c5 érer èrerions/n't' érer po:cond po:1pl
SFX c5 éser èserions/n't' éser po:cond po:1pl
SFX c5 éter èterions/n't' éter po:cond po:1pl
SFX c5 étrer ètrerions/n't' étrer po:cond po:1pl
SFX c5 évrer èvrerions/n't' évrer po:cond po:1pl
SFX c5 éyer èyerions/n't' éyer po:cond po:1pl
SFX c5 er eriez/n'm' er po:cond po:2pl
SFX c5 ébrer èbreriez/n'm' ébrer po:cond po:2pl
SFX c5 écer èceriez/n'm' écer po:cond po:2pl
SFX c5 écher ècheriez/n'm' écher po:cond po:2pl
SFX c5 écrer ècreriez/n'm' écrer po:cond po:2pl
SFX c5 éder èderiez/n'm' éder po:cond po:2pl
SFX c5 éger ègeriez/n'm' éger po:cond po:2pl
SFX c5 égler ègleriez/n'm' égler po:cond po:2pl
SFX c5 égner ègneriez/n'm' égner po:cond po:2pl
SFX c5 égrer ègreriez/n'm' égrer po:cond po:2pl
SFX c5 éguer ègueriez/n'm' éguer po:cond po:2pl
SFX c5 éler èleriez/n'm' éler po:cond po:2pl
SFX c5 émer èmeriez/n'm' émer po:cond po:2pl
SFX c5 éner èneriez/n'm' éner po:cond po:2pl
SFX c5 éper èperiez/n'm' éper po:cond po:2pl
SFX c5 équer èqueriez/n'm' équer po:cond po:2pl
SFX c5 érer èreriez/n'm' érer po:cond po:2pl
